Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE
5. [OLD]

LETTERS OF
CREDIT

§§490:5-101 to 490:5-117 REPEALED. L
1996, c 39, §10.

ARTICLE 5.

LETTERS OF
CREDIT

§490:5-101 Short title. This article
may be cited as Uniform Commercial Code--Letters of Credit. [L 1996, c 39, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next